Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.36, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Appropriations. (a) $6,800,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to counties as required under this section. (b) $2,000,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to tier I cities as required under this section. (c) $1,200,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to eligible Tribal Nations as required under this section. (d) In fiscal years 2024 and 2025 only, an additional $8,500,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to counties as required under this section. In fiscal years 2024 and 2025 only, an additional $2,500,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to tier I cities as required under this section. In fiscal years 2024 and 2025 only, an additional $1,500,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to eligible Tribal Nations as required under this section. In fiscal years 2024 and 2025 only, the commissioner shall transfer from the funds available to counties to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency a sum sufficient to increase the amount in the account or accounts established under subdivision 3, paragraph (e), to $2,250,000. For aids payable in 2023 only, the commissioner may compute the amount of aid to be paid to aid recipients as late as August 1, 2023, and may make payments of aid under this section in one installment on December 26. new text begin (e) In fiscal years 2026 and 2027 only, an additional $17,000,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to counties as required under this section. In fiscal years 2026 and 2027 only, an additional $5,000,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to tier I cities as required under this section. In fiscal years 2026 and 2027 only, an additional $3,000,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to eligible Tribal Nations as required under this section. For aids payable in 2025 only, the commissioner may compute the additional amounts of aid to be distributed pursuant to subdivision 2 as late as July 15, 2025, and need not certify the additional amounts. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aids payable in 2025 and 2026. new text end